apertium-eu-hu.eu.lexc
LEXICON EDUKITENSE
+V+Ind+Prs+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Sg1:daukat SUBCL ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Sg2:daukazu SUBCL ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Sg3:dauka SUBCL ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Pl1:daukagu SUBCL ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Pl2:daukazue SUBCL ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Pl3:daukate SUBCL ;

+V+Ind+Prs+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Sg1:dauzkat SUBCL ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Sg2:dauzkazu SUBCL ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Sg3:dauzka SUBCL ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Pl1:dauzkagu SUBCL ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Pl2:dauzkazue SUBCL ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Pl3:dauzkate SUBCL ;
 
+V+Ind+Prt+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Sg1:neukan SUBCL ; 
+V+Ind+Prt+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Sg2:zeneukan SUBCL ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Sg3:zeukan SUBCL ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Pl1:geneukan SUBCL ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Pl2:zeneukaten SUBCL ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Pl3:zeukaten SUBCL ;

+V+Ind+Prt+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Sg1:neuzkan SUBCL ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Sg2:zeneuzkan SUBCL ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Sg3:zeuzkan SUBCL ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Pl1:geneuzkan SUBCL ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Pl2:zeneuzkaten SUBCL ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Pl3:zeuzkaten SUBCL ;

LEXICON JAKIN
+V:jakin ARAZI ;
+V+Prc:jakin # ; !Partizip
+V+Der/N:jakitze # ; ! - nominalisation
+V+Pot:jakin # ; ! + Potential form des Auxiliars
+V+Cond:ba JANKINTENSE ;
+V+Ind: JAKINTENSE ; !

LEXICON JAKINTENSE
+Prs+Erg/Sg1:%>dakit SUBCL ;
+Prs+Erg/Sg2+ifl/f:%>dakin SUBCL ; 
+Prs+Erg/Sg2+ifl/m:%>dakik SUBCL ;
+Prs+Erg/Sg2:%>dakizu SUBCL ;
+Prs+Erg/Sg3:%>daki SUBCL ;
+Prs+Erg/Pl1:%>dakigu SUBCL ;
+Prs+Erg/Pl2:%>dakizue SUBCL ;
+Prs+Erg/Pl3:%>dakite SUBCL ;

!prt
+Prt+Erg/Sg1:%>nekien SUBCL ;
+Prt+Erg/Sg2+ifl:%>hekien SUBCL ; 
+Prt+Erg/Sg2:%>zenekien SUBCL ;
+Prt+Erg/Sg3:%>zekien SUBCL ;
+Prt+Erg/Pl1:%>genekien SUBCL ;
+Prt+Erg/Pl2:%>zenekiten SUBCL ;
+Prt+Erg/Pl3:%>zekiten SUBCL ;



LEXICON AuxIzan

+V+Prc:izan # ; !Partizip
+V+Der/N:izate # ; ! - nominalisation
+V+Cont:izaten # ;
+V+Pot:izan # ; ! + Potential form des Auxiliars
+V+Ind+Fut:izango # ;
+V+Aux+Ind: IZANNOR ;
+V+Aux: IZANBA ;
+V+Sub+Temp:izanez # ;

LEXICON IZANBA
+Cond:%>ba IZANNOR ;

LEXICON AuxUkan
+V+Aux: UKANNORNORK ;
+V+Aux: IZANNORNORI ;
+V+Aux: UKANNORNORINORK ;
+V+Aux: UKANBA ;

LEXICON UKANBA
+Cond:%>ba UKANNORNORK ;
+Cond:%>ba IZANNORNORI ;
+Cond:%>ba UKANNORNORINORK ;

LEXICON IZANNOR

+Prs+Abs/Sg1:naiz SUBCL ;
+Prs+Abs/Sg2+ifl:haiz SUBCL ; !+Ind+Prs+Abs/hi
+Prs+Abs/Sg2:zara SUBCL ;
+Prs+Abs/Sg3:da SUBCL ;
+Prs+Abs/Pl1:gara SUBCL ;
+Prs+Abs/Pl2:zarete SUBCL ;
+Prs+Abs/Pl3:dira SUBCL ;

!prt - en
+Prt+Abs/Sg1:nintzen SUBCL ;
+Prt+Abs/Sg2+ifl:hintzen SUBCL ;
+Prt+Abs/Sg2:zinen SUBCL ;
+Prt+Abs/Sg3:zen SUBCL ;
+Prt+Abs/Pl1:ginen SUBCL ;
+Prt+Abs/Pl2:zineten SUBCL ;
+Prt+Abs/Pl3:ziren SUBCL ;

!pot
+Pot+Prs+Abs/Sg1:naiteke SUBCL ;
+Pot+Prs+Abs/Sg2+ifl:haiteke SUBCL ; !+Ind+Prs+Abs/hi
+Pot+Prs+Abs/Sg2:zaitezke SUBCL ;
+Pot+Prs+Abs/Sg3:daiteke SUBCL ;
+Pot+Prs+Abs/Pl1:gaitezke SUBCL ;
+Pot+Prs+Abs/Pl2:zaitezkete SUBCL ;
+Pot+Prs+Abs/Pl3:daitezke SUBCL ;

!pot
+Concl+Prs+Abs/Sg1:nintzateke SUBCL ;
+Concl+Prs+Abs/Sg2+ifl:hintzateke SUBCL ; !+Ind+Prs+Abs/hi
+Concl+Prs+Abs/Sg2:zinateke SUBCL ;
+Concl+Prs+Abs/Sg3:litzateke SUBCL ;
+Concl+Prs+Abs/Pl1:ginateke SUBCL ;
+Concl+Prs+Abs/Pl2:zinatekete SUBCL ;
+Concl+Prs+Abs/Pl3:lirateke SUBCL ;


LEXICON UKANNORNORK

+Ind+Prs+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Sg1:dut SUBCL ;
+Ind+Prs+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Sg2:duzu SUBCL ;
+Ind+Prs+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Sg3:du SUBCL ;
+Ind+Prs+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Pl1:dugu SUBCL ;
+Ind+Prs+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Pl2:duzue SUBCL ;
+Ind+Prs+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Pl3:dute SUBCL ;
 
+Ind+Prs+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Sg1:ditut SUBCL ;
+Ind+Prs+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Sg2:dituzu SUBCL ;
+Ind+Prs+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Sg3:ditu SUBCL ;
+Ind+Prs+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Pl1:ditugu SUBCL ;
+Ind+Prs+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Pl2:dituzue SUBCL ;
+Ind+Prs+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Pl3:dituzte SUBCL ;

!prt - en
+Ind+Prt+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Sg1:nuen SUBCL ;
+Ind+Prt+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Sg2:zenuen SUBCL ;
+Ind+Prt+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Sg3:zuen SUBCL ;
+Ind+Prt+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Pl1:genuen SUBCL ;
+Ind+Prt+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Pl2:zenuten SUBCL ;
+Ind+Prt+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Pl3:zuten SUBCL ;
 
+Ind+Prt+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Sg1:nituen SUBCL ;
+Ind+Prt+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Sg2:zenituen SUBCL ;
+Ind+Prt+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Sg3:zituen SUBCL ;
+Ind+Prt+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Pl1:genituen SUBCL ;
+Ind+Prt+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Pl2:zenituzten SUBCL ;
+Ind+Prt+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Pl3:zituzten SUBCL ;

!pot
+Pot+Prs+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Sg1:nuke SUBCL ;
+Pot+Prs+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Sg2:zenuke SUBCL ;
+Pot+Prs+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Sg3:luke SUBCL ;
+Pot+Prs+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Pl1:genuke SUBCL ;
+Pot+Prs+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Pl2:zenukete SUBCL ;
+Pot+Prs+Abs/Sg3+Erg/Pl3:lukete SUBCL ;
 
+Pot+Prs+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Sg1:nituke SUBCL ;
+Pot+Prs+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Sg2:zenituke SUBCL ;
+Pot+Prs+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Sg3:lituke SUBCL ;
+Pot+Prs+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Pl1:genituke SUBCL ;
+Pot+Prs+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Pl2:zenitukete SUBCL ;
+Pot+Prs+Abs/Pl3+Erg/Pl3:litukete SUBCL ;


LEXICON IZANNORNORI

+Ind+Prs+Abs/Sg3+Dat/Sg1:zait SUBCL ;
+Ind+Prs+Abs/Sg3+Dat/Sg2+ifl: SUBCL ; !+Ind+Prs+Abs/hi
+Ind+Prs+Abs/Sg3+Dat/Sg2:zaizu SUBCL ;
+Ind+Prs+Abs/Sg3+Dat/Sg3:zaio SUBCL ;
+Ind+Prs+Abs/Sg3+Dat/Pl1:zaigu SUBCL ;
+Ind+Prs+Abs/Sg3+Dat/Pl2:zaizue SUBCL ;
+Ind+Prs+Abs/Sg3+Dat/Pl3:zaie SUBCL ;

+Ind+Prs+Abs/Pl3+Dat/Sg1:zaizkit SUBCL ;
+Ind+Prs+Abs/Pl3+Dat/Sg2+ifl: SUBCL ; !+Ind+Prs+Abs/hi
+Ind+Prs+Abs/Pl3+Dat/Sg2:zaizkizu SUBCL ;
+Ind+Prs+Abs/Pl3+Dat/Sg3:zaizkio SUBCL ;
+Ind+Prs+Abs/Pl3+Dat/Pl1:zaizkigu SUBCL ;
+Ind+Prs+Abs/Pl3+Dat/Pl2:zaizkizue SUBCL ;
+Ind+Prs+Abs/Pl3+Dat/Pl3:zaizkie SUBCL ;

+Ind+Prt+Abs/Sg3+Dat/Sg1:nintzaidan SUBCL ;
+Ind+Prt+Abs/Sg3+Dat/Sg2+ifl:hintzaik SUBCL ; !+Ind+Prs+Abs/hi
+Ind+Prt+Abs/Sg3+Dat/Sg2:zintzaizun SUBCL ;
+Ind+Prt+Abs/Sg3+Dat/Sg3:zitzaion SUBCL ;
+Ind+Prt+Abs/Sg3+Dat/Pl1:gintzaizkigun SUBCL ;
+Ind+Prt+Abs/Sg3+Dat/Pl2:zintzaizkizueten SUBCL ;
+Ind+Prt+Abs/Sg3+Dat/Pl3:aitzaizkien SUBCL ;


+Concl+Prs+Abs/Sg3+Dat/Sg1:litzaidake SUBCL ;
+Concl+Prs+Abs/Sg3+Dat/Sg2+ifl:litzaiake SUBCL ; !+Ind+Prs+Abs/hi
+Concl+Prs+Abs/Sg3+Dat/Sg2:litzaizuke SUBCL ;
+Concl+Prs+Abs/Sg3+Dat/Sg3:litzaiake SUBCL ;
+Concl+Prs+Abs/Sg3+Dat/Pl1:litzaiguke SUBCL ;
+Concl+Prs+Abs/Sg3+Dat/Pl2:litzaizueke SUBCL ;
+Concl+Prs+Abs/Sg3+Dat/Pl3:litzaieke SUBCL ;
 Concl
+Concl+Prs+Abs/Pl3+Dat/Sg1:litzaizkidake SUBCL ;
+Concl+Prs+Abs/Pl3+Dat/Sg2+ifl:lizaizkiake SUBCL ; !+Ind+Prs+Abs/hi
+Concl+Prs+Abs/Pl3+Dat/Sg2:litzaizkizuke SUBCL ;
+Concl+Prs+Abs/Pl3+Dat/Sg3:litzaizkiake SUBCL ;
+Concl+Prs+Abs/Pl3+Dat/Pl1:litzaizkiguke SUBCL ;
+Concl+Prs+Abs/Pl3+Dat/Pl2:litzaizkizueke SUBCL ;
+Concl+Prs+Abs/Pl3+Dat/Pl3:litzaizkieke SUBCL ;

LEXICON Verbs
izan: AuxIzan ; !"be" 
jakin: JAKIN ; !"know"
ukan: AuxUkan ; !"be"
